apertium-is-sv.sv.dix
<pardef n="n/att__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~att / ~atten / ~ätter / ~ätterna -->
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>       <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atten</l>     <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätter</l>     <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätterna</l>   <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bokst/av__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~av / ~aven / ~äver / ~äverna -->
  <e>       <p><l>av</l>        <r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aven</l>      <r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äver</l>      <r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äverna</l>    <r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="abborr/e__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~e / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="apotekar/e__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sp"> <!-- Common; ~e / ~en / ~e / ~na; invariant singular/plural indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kis/el__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~el / ~let / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sek/el__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~el / ~let / ~el / ~len; invariant singular/plural indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="med/el__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~el / ~let / ~el / ~len; invariant singular/plural indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cyk/el__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~el / ~eln / ~lar / ~larna -->
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eln</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lar</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>larna</l>     <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="toff/el__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~el / ~eln / ~lor / ~lorna -->
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eln</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lor</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lorna</l>     <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dragspel__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~en; invariable in indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="teck/en__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~en / ~net / ~en / ~nen; invariable in indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pill/er__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Common; ~er / ~ret / ~er / ~ren; invariant in indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bull/er__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> 
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bekym/mer__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Common; ~er / ~ret / ~er / ~ren; invariant in indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>        <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mret</l>       <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>        <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mren</l>       <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kalend/er__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~er / ~ern / ~rar / ~rarna -->
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="optimism"><i>optimi</i><par n="pill/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="läger"><i>läg</i><par n="pill/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="eu-medel"><i>eu-med</i><par n="med/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="budgetmedel"><i>budgetmed</i><par n="med/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="statsminister"><i>statsminist</i><par n="kalend/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="egenföretagare"><i>egenföretagar</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="massförstörelsevapen"><i>massförstörelsevap</i><par n="teck/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="klartecken"><i>klarteck</i><par n="teck/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="hinder"><i>hind</i><par n="pill/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="hjälpmedel"><i>hjälpmed</i><par n="med/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="buller"><i>bull</i><par n="bull/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="kapitel"><i>kapit</i><par n="sek/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="läkemedel"><i>läkemed</i><par n="med/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="make"><i>mak</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="livsmedel"><i>livsmed</i><par n="med/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="mönster"><i>mönst</i><par n="pill/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="nötkött"><i>nötkött</i><par n="dragspel__n"/></e>
<e lm="natt"><i>n</i><par n="n/att__n"/></e>
<e lm="gissel"><i>giss</i><par n="med/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="regel"><i>reg</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="minister"><i>minist</i><par n="kalend/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="transportmedel"><i>transportmed</i><par n="med/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="register"><i>regist</i><par n="pill/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="frågetecken"><i>frågeteck</i><par n="teck/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="arbetstagare"><i>arbetstagar</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="titel"><i>tit</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="misstanke"><i>misstank</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="vatten"><i>vatt</i><par n="teck/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="bekymmer"><i>bekym</i><par n="bekym/mer__n"/></e>
<e lm="sekel"><i>sek</i><par n="sek/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="tålamod"><i>tålamod</i><par n="dragspel__n"/></e>
<e lm="vinkel">          <i>vink</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="löpare">          <i>löpar</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="åskådare">        <i>åskådar</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="talare">          <i>talar</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="bokstav">         <i>bokst</i><par n="bokst/av__n"/></e>
<e lm="center">          <i>cent</i><par n="kalend/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="feber">           <i>feb</i><par n="kalend/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="greve">           <i>grev</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="kisel">           <i>kis</i><par n="kis/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="svavel">          <i>svav</i><par n="kis/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="nickel">          <i>nick</i><par n="kis/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="exempel">         <i>exemp</i><par n="sek/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="jordgubbe">       <i>jordgubb</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="kakel">           <i>kak</i><par n="sek/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="kapitel">         <i>kapit</i><par n="sek/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="kejsare">         <i>kejsar</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="mage">            <i>mag</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="moster">          <i>most</i><par n="kalend/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="orgel">           <i>org</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="titel">           <i>tit</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="bibel">           <i>bib</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="natt">            <i>n</i><par n="n/att__n"/></e>
<e lm="piller">          <i>pill</i><par n="pill/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="segel">           <i>seg</i><par n="sek/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="stege">           <i>steg</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="syster">          <i>syst</i><par n="kalend/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="tempel">          <i>temp</i><par n="sek/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="tumme">           <i>tumm</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="våld">            <i>våld</i><par n="dragspel__n"/></e>
<e lm="poäng">           <i>poäng</i><par n="dragspel__n"/></e>
<e lm="missbruk">        <i>missbruk</i><par n="dragspel__n"/></e>
<e lm="automatvapen">    <i>automatvap</i><par n="teck/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="vapen">           <i>vap</i><par n="teck/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="måne">            <i>mån</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="pendel">          <i>pend</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="frågetecken">     <i>frågeteck</i><par n="teck/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="läger">           <i>läg</i><par n="pill/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="sammanhang">      <i>sammanhang</i><par n="dragspel__n"/></e>
<e lm="sjukhus">         <i>sjukhus</i><par n="dragspel__n"/></e>
